Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0532.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 803i. (1) A person who was or is a member of the National Guard may apply to the secretary of state for a special registration plate that displays an appropriate vignette preceding the registration numbers and has the words "national guard" inscribed beneath the registration numbers for passenger vehicles only. (2) A person who was or is a member of the United States Armed Forces Reserve may apply to the secretary of state for a special registration plate that displays an appropriate vignette preceding the registration numbers. (3) A person who was a member of any branch of the United States Armed Forces who has retired or been granted an honorable discharge from that branch of the United States Armed Forces and who is not otherwise eligible for a special registration plate under this act may apply to the secretary of state for a special registration plate that displays an appropriate vignette preceding the registration numbers if the person is 1 of the following: (a) Beginning 180 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this subdivision, a current member of any branch of the United States Armed Forces. (b) A former member of any branch of the United States Armed Forces who has retired or been granted an honorable discharge from that branch of the United States Armed Forces. (4) Application for a special registration plate must be on a form prescribed by the secretary of state and must be accompanied by any proof of the applicant being or having been a member of the National Guard or the United States Armed Forces Reserve or a member as described in subsection (3) of the United States Armed Forces that the secretary of state may require. The application of an active duty member must include permission from the applicant?s unit commander endorsing the application, in a form and manner as prescribed by the department. The application for a special registration plate must not require a service fee under section 804. (5) Upon On proper application, the secretary of state shall issue 1 or more special registration plates under this section for each applicant for use on a passenger vehicle or, for the purposes of subsection (1) or (3), for use on a motorcycle. A person who is disabled who applies for a special registration plate under this section must be issued a tab for persons with disabilities as provided in section 803f for his or her the person's special registration plate. The secretary of state shall require the same proof that the applicant is a disabled person as is required for issuance of a permanent windshield placard under section 675. A person issued 1 or more special registration plates under subsection (1), (2), or (3) must be assessed the applicable tax provided in section 801. (6) The use of a special registration plate issued under this section on a vehicle other than the vehicle for which the plate is issued, or by a person who does not qualify under this section, is a misdemeanor. (7) The special registration plate issued under this section expires on the birthday of the vehicle owner. When new plates are issued by the secretary of state, application for renewal of the special registration plate must not require a service fee under section 804. The applicant is not required to furnish the proof provided in subsection (4).